Hawaii statutes.
§431:4-312 Members proxies. (a) A
member of a domestic mutual insurer may vote in person or by proxy given
another member on any matter coming before a corporate meeting of members.

(b) No proxy shall be valid beyond the earlier
of the following dates:

(1) The date of expiration set forth in the proxy;

(2) The date of termination of membership; or

(3) Five years from the date of execution of the
proxy.

(c) No member's vote upon any proposal to
divest the insurer of its business and assets, or the major part thereof, shall
be registered or taken except in person or by a proxy newly executed and
specific as to the matter to be voted upon. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next